test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aaigast_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āigast: # Noun 140 'eng /est aasta/fin' - full paradigm
     āigast+N+Sg+Nom: āigast
     āigast+N+Sg+Gen: āigast
     āigast+N+Sg+Par: āigastõ
     āigast+N+Sg+Dat: āigastõn
     āigast+N+Sg+Ins: āigastõks
     āigast+N+Sg+Ill: āigastõ
     āigast+N+Sg+Ela: āigastõst
     āigast+N+Pl+Nom: āigastõd
     āigast+N+Pl+Gen: āigastõd
     āigast+N+Pl+Par: āigastidi
     āigast+N+Pl+Dat: āigastõdõn
     āigast+N+Pl+Ins: āigastõdõks
     āigast+N+Pl+Ill: āigastiž
     āigast+N+Pl+Ela: āigastist
